Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2211
Regulating board; powers.

Nothing in sections 21-2201 to 21-2222 shall restrict or limit in any manner the authority and duty of a regulating board in registering individuals licensed to perform professional services or the practice of the profession which is within the jurisdiction of such board, notwithstanding the fact that such individual is an officer, director, shareholder or employee of a professional corporation and renders such professional service or engages in the practice of such profession through the professional corporation.

Laws 1969, c. 121, § 11, p. 558.